Utah statutes.
39-6-42.   Depositions -- Procedure.
(1)  After charges have been signed under Section 39-6-23, any party may take
oral or written depositions unless the military judge hearing the case, or if
the case is not being heard, an authority competent to convene a military
court for the trial of those charges prohibits the depositions for good cause.
(2)  The party at whose instance a deposition is to be taken shall give to
every other party reasonable written notice of the time and place for taking
the deposition.
(3)  Depositions may be taken before and authenticated by any military or
civil officer authorized under state law or the law of the jurisdiction where
the deposition is taken to administer oaths.
(4)  An authenticated deposition, taken upon reasonable notice to the other
parties, may be read in evidence, to the extent it is admissible under the
rules of evidence, before any military court or any proceeding before a court
of inquiry, if it appears to the court:
(a)  the witness resides or is beyond the state in which the military court or
court of inquiry is ordered to sit, or beyond the distance of 100 miles from
the location of the trial or hearing;
(b)  the witness due to death, age, illness, bodily infirmity, imprisonment,
military necessity, nonamenability to process, or other reasonable cause, is
unable or refuses to appear and testify in person at the location of the trial
or hearing;
(c)  the present location of the witness is unknown; or
(d)  the deposition was taken in the physical presence of the accused.
